Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-335
Abortion by other
than licensed physician; penalty;
physical presence; violation; penalty.

(1) The performing of an abortion
by any person other than a licensed physician is a Class IV felony.

(2) No abortion
shall be performed, induced, or attempted unless the physician who uses or
prescribes any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or other substance to perform,
induce, or attempt the abortion is physically present in the same room with
the patient when the physician performs, induces, or attempts to perform or
induce the abortion. Any person who knowingly or recklessly violates this
subsection shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. No civil or criminal penalty
shall be assessed against the patient upon whom the abortion is performed,
induced, or attempted to be performed or induced.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 50;

Laws 2011, LB521, § 1.